CIK: 353569
Company Name: QUIDEL CORP DE 
Form Type : 10-K
Filing Date: 2016-02-23
Accession Number: 0000353569-16-000078


Item 1 Business All references to we, our, and us in this Annual Report refer to Quidel Corporation and its subsidiaries. Overview We have a leadership position in the development, manufacturing and marketing of rapid diagnostic testing solutions. These diagnostic testing solutions primarily include applications in infectious diseases, women health and gastrointestinal diseases. We sell our products directly to end users and distributors, in each case, for professional use in physician offices, hospitals, clinical laboratories, reference laboratories, leading universities, retail clinics, pharmacies and wellness screening centers. We market our products in the United States through a ne2rk of national and regional distributors, and through a direct sales force. Internationally, we market primarily through distributor arrangements. We commenced our operations in 1979 and launched our first products, dipstick based pregnancy tests, in 1983 Since such time, our product base and technology platforms have expanded through internal development and acquisitions of other products, technologies and companies. Our diagnostic solutions aid in the detection and diagnosis of many critical diseases and other medical conditions, including infectious diseases, women health, gastrointestinal diseases, autoimmune diseases, b1 health and thyroid diseases. In February 2010, we expanded our operations through the acquisition of Diagnostic Hybrids, Inc. ( DHI ), a privately held, in vitro diagnostics ( IVD ) company, based in Athens, Ohio. DHI is a market leader in the manufacturing and commercialization of FDA cleared direct fluorescent IVD assays used in hospitals and reference laboratories for a variety of diseases, including certain viral infections and thyroid diseases. In 2013, we completed 2 further acquisitions, acquiring BioHelix Corporation ( BioHelix ), a developer and manufacturer of isothermal molecular assays and enzymes, in May 2013, and acquiring the assets of AnDiaTec GmbH ( AnDiaTec ), a German based developer and manufacturer of molecular assays, in August 2013 Corporate Information We are a corporation, originally incorporated as Monoclonal Antibodies, Inc. in California in 1979 and re incorporated as Quidel Corporation in the State of Delaware in 1987. Our executive offices are located at 12544 High Bluff Drive, Suite 200, San Diego, California 92130, and our teleph1 number is (858) 552 1100. This Annual Report and each of our other periodic and current reports, including any amendments thereto, are available, free of charge, on our website, www.quidel.com, as soon as reasonably practicable after such material is electronically filed with or furnished to the SEC. The information contained on our website is not incorporated by reference into this Annual Report and should not be considered part of this Annual Report. In addition, the SEC website contains reports, proxy and information statements, and other information about us at www.sec.gov. Business Strategy Our primary objective is to increase shareholder value by building a broader based diagnostic company capable of delivering revenue growth and more consistent operating results. Our strategy is to identify potential market segments that provide, or are expected to provide, significant total market opportunities, and in which we can be successful by applying our significant expertise and know how to develop differentiated technologies and products. Our diagnostic testing solutions are designed to provide specialized results that serve a broad range of customers, by addressing the market requirements of ease of use, reduced cost, increased test accuracy and reduced time to result. Our current approach to address this diagnostic continuum relative to our strategy is comprised of 3 parts rapid point of care immunoassay tests for use in physician offices, hospital laboratories and emergency departments, retail clinics, pharmacies and other urgent care or alternative site settings; direct fluorescent assays ( DFA ) and culture based tests for the clinical virology laboratory; and molecular diagnostic tests across a number of laboratory and other segments. Our current focus to accomplish our primary objective includes the following leveraging our current infrastructure to develop and launch new rapid immunoassays such as additional assays for our FDA approved Sofia and next generation analyzers; 3 developing a molecular diagnostics franchise that incorporates 3 distinct testing platforms, AmpliVue , Savanna and Solana and that leverages our molecular assay development competencies; and strengthening our position with distribution partners and our end user customers to gain more emphasis on our products in the U.S. and abroad. Our current initiatives to execute this strategy include the following continue to focus our research and development efforts on 3 areas new proprietary product platform development; the creation of improved products and new products for existing markets and unmet clinical needs; and pursuit of collaborations with, or acquisitions of, other companies for new and existing products and markets that advance our differentiated strategy. provide clinicians with validated studies that encompass the clinical efficacy and economic efficiency of our diagnostic tests for the professional market; strengthen our market and brand leadership in infectious diseases, women health and gastrointestinal diseases by acquiring and or developing and introducing clinically superior diagnostic solutions; strengthen our direct sales force to enhance relationships with integrated delivery ne2rks, laboratories and hospitals, with a goal of driving growth through improved physician and laboratorian satisfaction; leverage our wireless connectivity and data management systems, including cloud based tools; support payer evaluation of diagnostic tests and establishment of favorable reimbursement rates; continue to create strong global alliances to support our efforts to achieve leadership in key markets and expand our presence in emerging markets; and further refine our manufacturing efficiencies and productivity improvements to improve profit, with continued focus on profitable products and markets and our effort to create a core competency in new product development. Product development activities are inherently uncertain, and there can be no assurance that we will be able to obtain regulatory body clearance to market any of our products, or if we obtain clearances, that we will successfully commercialize any of our products. In addition, we may terminate our development efforts with respect to 1 or more of our products under development at any time, including before or during clinical trials. The Overall Market for In Vitro Diagnostics Customers for IVD products are primarily centralized laboratories and physician offices and decentralized point of care settings. Centralized testing market The centralized in vitro diagnostic testing process typically involves obtaining a specimen of blood, urine or other sample from the patient and sending the sample from the healthcare provider office, hospital unit or clinic to a central laboratory. In a typical visit to the physician office, after the patient test specimen is collected, the patient is usually sent home and receives the results of the test several hours or days later. The result of this process is that the patient may leave the physician office without confirmation of the diagnosis and the opportunity to begin potentially more effective immediate care. Decentralized POC market Point of care ( POC ) testing for certain diseases has become an accepted adjunct to central laboratory and self testing. The professional POC market is comprised of 2 general segments decentralized testing in non institutional settings, such as physicians offices, and hospital testing (e.g., emergency rooms and bedside). Hospital POC testing is accepted and growing and is generally an extension of the hospital central laboratory. Hospitals in the U.S. have progressively sought to reduce the length of patient stays and, consequently, the proportion of cases seen as outpatients have increased. If the U.S. experience is representative of future trends, emergency departments and other critical care units such as intensive care units, operating rooms, trauma and cardiac centers are increasingly becoming the principal centers for the management of moderate and severe acute illness. 4 Out of hospital testing sites consist of physicians office laboratories, nursing homes, pharmacies, retail clinics and other non institutional, ambulatory settings in which healthcare providers perform diagnostic tests. This decentralized POC market encompasses a large variety of IVD products ranging from moderate sized instrumented diagnostic systems serving larger group practices to single use, disposable tests. We believe POC testing is increasing due to its clinical benefit, fast results, cost effectiveness and patient satisfaction. We believe that the growth in POC testing is in part due to evolving technological improvements creating high quality tests with laboratory accuracy and POC ease of use, some of which are capable of being granted a waiver under the Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments of 1988 ( CLIA ). Products We provide diagnostic testing solutions under various brand names, including, among others, the following Quidel , QuickVue , QuickVue+ , Sofia , AmpliVue , Solana , Virena , MicroVue TM , Lyra , FreshCells TM , D3 , FastPoint , ReadyCells , Super E Mix TM , ELVIRA , ELVIS and Thyretain . System Platforms New and In Development Our diagnostic testing solutions are provided through a number of proprietary platforms, including the following platforms recently developed or in development Fluorescent Immunoassays Sofia Analyzer. Sofia is the brand name for our fluorescent immunoassay ( FIA ) system. The easy to use Sofia Analyzer combines unique software, when used in conjunction with Sofia FIA tests, to yield an automatic, objective result that is readily available on the instrument screen, in a hard copy printout, and in a transmissible electronic form that can ne2rk via a lab information system to hospital and medical center databases. The Sofia FIA tests employ advanced lateral flow and immunofluorescence technologies to provide enhanced performance for several assays as noted in our disease state discussion below. The Sofia Analyzer provides for different operational modes to accommodate both small and large laboratories as well as other features designed to facilitate use in a variety of healthcare settings, including hospitals, medical centers, and small clinics. Next Generation Analyzer. We are developing the next generation Sofia Analyzer with added benefits and features and at a cost point that allows us to better address the lower volume segment of the diagnostic testing market. We believe users will see an improvement in individual test performance and workflow. Enhanced optics are designed to provide added performance benefits and kinetic reading is designed to enable positive test results to be read in as few as 2 minutes. Similar to the original Sofia Analyzer, the next generation analyzer is planned to initially center around respiratory assays and then extend into Women's Health; Lyme Disease; and Vitamin D tests. Molecular Assays Lyra . Our open system molecular assays run on several thermocyclers currently on the market. We have several existing Lyra Molecular Real Time Polymerase Chain Reaction ( PCR ) assays that provide important benefits to the customer, including, among others, room temperature storage, reduced process time, and ready to use reagent configurations. These include several assays as noted in our disease state discussion below. AmpliVue . With our Molecular AmpliVue hand held molecular diagnostic assay platform, the detection of the pathogen is achieved using a hand held, fully contained cassette that combines isothermal Helicase Dependent Amplification ( HDA ) with lateral flow detection technology, and is currently used in several assays also noted in our disease state discussion below. Solana. The Solana system was developed as an extension to the AmpliVue product line, running the same proprietary HDA technology. Solana is an easy to run amplification and detection system that has the ability to concurrently run up to 12 assays. With minimal sample preparation for Solana assays, the system has the potential to receive a CLIA waiver. Molecular Systems in Development Savanna. We are developing the Savanna system as a rugged, low cost, fully integrated system with novel extraction, and sample in result out simplicity. The system is expected to be able to run either PCR or HDA assays from multiple sample types. 5 Connectivity and Data Management Virena. Virena is a wireless cellular instrument management and surveillance system that operates as a cloud based solution connecting Quidel instruments across a healthcare system and automatically transmitting de identified test results to a secure database. With Virena, a health system, physician office laboratory ( POL ), Urgent Care or Retail Clinic has the ability to compile, analyze, map and generate reports of de identified test results improving operational efficiencies, quality and patient outcome initiatives. Medical and Wellness Categories Our products address the following medical and wellness categories Infectious Diseases Influenza. Our Sofia Influenza A+B test, used in conjunction with our Sofia Analyzer, and our QuickVue influenza tests are rapid, qualitative tests for the detection of the viral antigens of influenza type A and B, the 2 most common types of the influenza virus. In addition, our Sofia Influenza A+B test has special 510(k) clearance for an update to our package insert to include analytical reactivity with an avian Influenza A (H7N9) strain, A Anhui 1 2013 In addition, during 2013, we began selling our Quidel Molecular Influenza A+B assay for use on the QuantStudio Dx Real Time PCR Instruments by Life Technologies. Streptococci. Our Sofia Strep A fluorescent immunoassay, used in conjunction with our Sofia Analyzer, and our QuickVue Strep A tests are intended for the rapid, qualitative detection of Group A Streptococcal antigen from throat swabs or confirmation of presumptive Group A Streptococcal colonies recovered from culture. Also, in late 2013, we began selling our AmpliVue Group B Strep Assay. In 2014, we began selling our AmpliVue Group A Strep Assays. Also in 2014, we received FDA clearance, via the de novo request procedure, for our Lyra Direct Strep Assay, a multiplex real time PCR assay that detects and differentiates between pyogenic Group A and pyogenic C or G Streptococcal throat infections. RSV. Our Sofia RSV test and our QuickVue RSV test are rapid immunoassay tests for Respiratory Syncytial Virus ( RSV ). During 2013, we also began selling our combo Quidel Molecular RSV + human metapneumovirus (hMPV) test. The majority of upper respiratory tract infections in children are caused by viruses and RSV is generally recognized as a frequent agent responsible for these infections. Multiplex Respiratory. Our cell culture and DFA detection solutions are used by reference laboratories, public health labs and acute care hospitals to detect seven major viral respiratory pathogens. Our proprietary cell culture platform R Mix TM combined with our FDA cleared antibody kit D3 Ultra DFA, detects Influenza A and B, RSV, Adenovirus and Parainfluenza types 1, 2 and 3, with turn around times between 16 and 48 hours. The same D3 Ultra DFA antibody kit can also be used for direct specimen testing for those viruses with turn around times in less than 90 minutes. In 2009, we introduced a new FDA cleared technology called D3 FastPoint that detects eight viruses, with human metapnuemovirus added to the testing menu. D3 FastPoint provides laboratories, in a direct specimen testing format, the ability to produce virus identification in less than 25 minutes from specimen receipt. In 2014, we launched our Lyra Adenovirus Assay, a real time PCR test for the qualitative detection of human adenovirus (HAdV) viral DNA, and our Lyra Parainfluenza Assay, a real time PCR test for the qualitative detection and identification of Parainfluenza virus infections for types 1, 2 or 3 viral RNA. General Virology. We provide a wide variety of traditional cell lines, specimen collection devices, media and controls for use in laboratories that culture and test for normal human viruses. We provide cell based products under the FreshCells brand in multiple different formats, including tubes, shell vials and multi well plates. Herpes and Herpes Family. Our proprietary engineered cell culture system, ELVIS HSV, is an FDA cleared and highly sensitive system for the isolation and detection of Herpes Simplex Virus ( HSV ) types 1 and 2 Herpes is a widespread sexually transmitted infection with an HSV 2 prevalence rate of 16% of the population according to the Centers for Disease Control ( CDC ). We also provide a multiplex cell culture solution using a propriety cell platform called H&V Mix TM that is used to isolate HSV, Varicella Zoster Virus ( VZV ) and Cytomegalovirus, all in the herpes family of viruses. Antibody detection and identification of each of these viruses can be performed with FDA cleared antibody products provided under the D3 DFA brand. During 2014, we also began commercializing our Lyra Direct HSV 1+2 VZV assay and AmpliVue HSV 1+2 for the differentiation and detection of herpes simplex viruses 1 and 2 (HSV 1+2) and Varicella Zoster Virus in active lesions within the United States. 6 POC Women and General Health Pregnancy. Our Sofia hCG fluorescent immunoassay and our QuickVue pregnancy tests are used for the qualitative detection of hCG in serum or urine for the early detection of pregnancy. The early detection of pregnancy enables the physician and patient to institute proper care, helping to promote the health of both the woman and the developing embryo. Graves Disease. Our FDA cleared bioassay called Thyretain is used for the differential diagnosis of an autoimmune disease called Graves Disease. Graves Disease is caused by antibodies that stimulate the thyroid horm1 receptors to create a hyperthyroid condition causing symptoms that include heart palpitations, unexplained weight loss, anxiety, depression and fatigue. Graves Disease is considered the most common autoimmune disorder in the U.S. according to an article published in the New England Journal of Medicine and it predominantly affects women. Thyretain is sold to reference laboratories and select acute care hospitals and has been successfully deployed on automated testing platforms. Chlamydia. Our QuickVue Chlamydia test is a lateral flow immunoassay for the rapid, qualitative detection of Chlamydia trachomatis from endocervical swab and cytology brush specimens. The test is intended for use as an aid in the presumptive diagnosis of Chlamydia. Chlamydia trachomatis is responsible for the most widespread sexually transmitted disease in the U.S. Over 1 half of infected women do not have symptoms and, if left untreated, Chlamydia trachomatis can cause sterility. B1 Health. Osteoporosis is a systemic skeletal disease characterized by low b1 mass and deterioration of the micro architecture of b1 tissue, with a consequent increase in b1 fragility and susceptibility to fractures. The risk for fracture increases exp1ntially with age. A key set of parameters in the monitoring of osteoporosis, both before and after therapy, are biochemical markers of b1 metabolism. As a leader in the research space with our biomarkers for b1 health, we produce both clinical and research products for the assessment of osteoporosis and the evaluation of b1 resorption formation, which, including our metabolic b1 markers, are used by physicians to monitor the effectiveness of therapy in pharmaceutical and related research. B1 Health, Autoimmune Disease and Oncology Our Specialty Products Group ( SPG ) business develops diagnostic and research products in the fields of oncology, b1 health and autoimmune disease. Assays are developed on a microwell platform and are currently marketed to clinicians and researchers. SPG is strategically focused on identifying and demonstrating clinical utility around these markers in a variety of disease states. In the area of autoimmune disease, we have developed Enzyme Linked Immunosorbent Assay ( ELISA ) based assays and reagents for the detection of activation products from the 3 main complement pathways. We currently sell these products both directly and through select distributors throughout the world under the Quidel and MicroVue brands. Gastrointestinal Diseases Clostridium difficile ( C. diff ). Our Quidel Molecular Direct C . diff assay is approved for use with the Life Technologies QuantStudio Dx and 7500 Fast Dx Applied Biosystems Real Time PCR Instruments. We also sell our C. diff assay as part of our expanding AmpliVue product line. C. diff is a life threatening bacterial infection, especially for the elderly and patients on a prolonged antibiotic regimen. Currently more than 500,000 cases of C. diff infections are diagnosed each year in the U.S. Enterovirus. Enteroviruses reproduce initially in the gastrointestinal tract before spreading to other organs such as the nervous system, heart and skin. Enteroviruses can also infect the respiratory tract. Enteroviruses such as Coxsackievirus A16 are referred to as Hand Foot and Mouth disease and commonly affect infants and children. Our indirect fluorescent antibody ( IFA ) products sold under the name Super E Mix and D3 IFA Enterovirus kit are used by reference laboratories and acute care hospitals. Immunoassay fecal occult blood. Our QuickVue test is a rapid, fecal immunochemical test ( FIT ) intended to detect the presence of blood in stool specimens. Blood in the stool is an indication of a number of gastrointestinal disorders, including colorectal cancer. We launched our first FIT test in late December 2005. Helicobacter pylori ( H. pylori ). H. pylori is the bacterium associated with approximately 80% of patients diagnosed with peptic ulcers in the U.S. H. pylori is implicated in chronic gastritis and is recognized by the World Health Organization as a Class 1 carcinogen that may increase a person risk of developing stomach cancer. Our rapid test is a serological test that measures antibodies circulating in the blood caused by the immune response to the H. pylori bacterium. 7 Seasonality Sales of our infectious disease products are subject to, and significantly affected by, the seasonal demands of the cold and flu seasons, prevalent during the fall and winter. As a result of these seasonal demands, we typically experience lower sales volume in the second and third quarters of the calendar year, and typically have higher sales in the first and fourth quarters of the calendar year. Historically, sales of our infectious disease products have varied from year to year based in large part on the severity, length and timing of the onset of the cold and flu season. For the years ended December 31, 2015 , 2014 and 2013 , sales of our infectious disease products accounted for 72% , 71% and 72% , respectively, of total revenue. Research and Development We continue to focus our research and development efforts on 3 areas new proprietary product platform development, the creation of improved products and new products for existing markets and unmet clinical needs, and pursuit of collaborations with, or acquisitions of, other companies for new and existing products and markets that advance our differentiated strategy. Research and development expenses were approximately $35.5 million , $37.9 million , and $34.2 million for the years ended December 31, 2015 , 2014 and 2013 , respectively. We anticipate that we will continue to devote a significant amount of financial resources to product and technology research and development for the foreseeable future. Marketing and Distribution Our business strategy is designed around serving the continuum of healthcare delivery needs starting with the POC clinicians located in small doctor office practices to moderately complex POLs through the highly complex environment in hospital and clinical reference laboratories. Within the inherent operational diversity of these various segments, we focus on ensuring market leadership and providing points of differentiation by specializing in the diagnosis and monitoring of selected disease states. Our marketing strategy includes ensuring that our key product portfolios are supported by clinical validation and health economic and outcomes research that show hospitals, laboratories, acute care facilities and POC clinicians that these tests deliver fast, high quality results, are cost effective to use, and improve patient outcomes. Our distribution strategy needs to accommodate the fact that the U.S. POC market is highly fragmented, with many small or medium sized customers. A ne2rk of national and regional distributors is utilized, combined with our own sales force, to reach customers using POC diagnostic tests. We have developed priority status with several of the major distributors in the U.S., resulting in many of our products having preferred product status with these distributors. We have expanded the size of our U.S. sales force in the past few years. As of December 31, 2015, we employed more than 100 U.S. sales representatives. We are utilizing this expanded sales force to work closely with our key distributors to drive market penetration of our products in the U.S. POC market, with a particular focus on addressing acute care and integrated delivery ne2rk customers. The sales, distribution and service of our cell culture and molecular diagnostic tests are controlled primarily by us. Laboratory end users in hospitals and clinical reference laboratories utilizing these diagnostic tests are reached through our own direct sales force and technical support services that have specialized training and understanding of the product portfolio. Internationally, the use of professional rapid POC diagnostic tests, the acceptance of testing outside the central laboratory, the regulatory requirements to sell POC tests and consumer interest in over the counter and self test products, differ considerably from the U.S. Our international sales are significantly lower than domestic sales, largely due to the POC market being more developed in the U.S. relative to the overall IVD market in other countries. We derive a significant portion of our total revenue from a relatively small number of distributors. 3 of our distributors, which are considered to be among the market leaders, collectively accounted for approximately 48% , 48% and 43% of our total revenue for the years ended December 31, 2015 , 2014 and 2013 , respectively. These distributors were McKesson Corporation, Cardinal Health, Inc., and Fisher Scientific Company. See Note 7 Industry and Geographic Information in the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included in this Annual Report. 8 Manufacturing We have 2 primary manufacturing sites. These 2 sites are in San Diego, California and Athens, Ohio. Our San Diego facility consists of laboratories devoted to tissue culture, cell culture, protein purification and immunochemistry and production areas dedicated to manufacturing and assembly. In the manufacturing process, biological and chemical supplies and equipment are used. Since the year 2000, the San Diego facility has operated under a Quality Management System certified to the International Organization for Standardization ( ISO ) 9001 certification. During 2005, we became certified to the ISO 134852003 Regulatory Standard as required for medical device manufacturers distributing product within the European Union and other countries. Many of the immunoassay products manufactured in our San Diego facility are packaged and shipped by a local third party. Our Athens facility consists of clean rooms (FS 209E Class 1000 ISO Class 6) for the culturing and dispensing of cell cultures under cGMP conditions. The facility also has laboratories devoted to tissue culture for the production of monoclonal antibodies. In the manufacturing process, biological and chemical supplies are used, as well as specialized equipment. The facility is also certified to the ISO 134852003 medical device standard. Packaging and shipping logistics are also handled at the facility. In 2013, we added a molecular manufacturing laboratory dedicated to the manufacture and assembly of our molecular products. We seek to conduct all of our manufacturing in compliance with the FDA Quality System Regulations ( QSR ) (formerly Good Manufacturing Practices) governing the manufacture of medical devices. Our manufacturing facilities have been registered with the FDA and the Department of Health Services of the State of California for our San Diego facility (the State FDA ), and have passed routine federal and state inspections confirming compliance with the QSR regulatory requirements. Government Regulation Regulation in the United States The testing, manufacture and commercialization of our products are subject to regulation by numerous governmental authorities, principally the FDA and corresponding state and foreign regulatory agencies. Pursuant to the U.S. Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act and the regulations promulgated thereunder, the FDA regulates the preclinical and clinical testing, manufacture, labeling, distribution and promotion of medical devices. Noncompliance with applicable requirements can result in, among other matters, fines, injunctions, civil penalties, recall or seizure of products, total or partial suspension of production, failure of the FDA to grant premarket clearance or premarket approval for devices, withdrawal of marketing clearances or approvals and criminal prosecution. The FDA also has the authority to request a recall, repair, replacement or refund of the cost of any device manufactured or distributed in the U.S. if the device is deemed to be unsafe. In the U.S., devices are classified into 1 of 3 classes (Class I, II or III) on the basis of the controls deemed necessary by the FDA to reasonably ensure their safety and effectiveness. Class I and II devices are subject to general controls including, but not limited to, performance standards, premarket notification ( 510(k) ) and post market surveillance. Class III devices generally pose the highest risk to the patient and are typically subject to premarket approval to ensure their safety and effectiveness. Our current products are all Class I or II. Prior to commercialization in the U.S. market, manufacturers must obtain FDA clearance through a premarket notification or premarket approval process, which can be lengthy, expensive and uncertain. The FDA has been requiring more rigorous demonstration of product performance as part of the 510(k) process, including submission of extensive clinical data. It generally takes from 3 to six months to obtain clearance but may take longer. A premarket approval application must be supported by valid scientific evidence to demonstrate the safety and effectiveness of the device, typically including the results of clinical investigations, bench tests and reference laboratory studies. In addition, modifications or enhancements for existing products that could significantly affect safety or effectiveness, or constitute a major change in the intended use of the device, will require new submissions to the FDA. On January 30, 2008, the FDA issued guidance entitled Guidance for Industry and FDA Staff Recommendation for CLIA waiver applications. The guidance sets forth new requirements for obtaining a CLIA waiver that are 1rous and have increased the time and cost required to obtain a CLIA waiver. Any devices we manufacture or distribute pursuant to FDA clearance or approvals are subject to continuing regulation by the FDA and certain state agencies, including adherence to QSR relating to testing, control, documentation and other quality assurance requirements. We must also comply with Medical Device Reporting ( MDR ) requirements mandating reporting to the FDA of any incident in which a device may have caused or contributed to a death or serious injury, or in which a device 9 malfuncti1d and, if the malfunction were to recur, would be likely to cause or contribute to a death or serious injury. Labeling and promotional activities are also subject to scrutiny by the FDA and, in certain circumstances, by the Federal Trade Commission. Current FDA enforcement policy prohibits the marketing of approved medical devices for unapproved uses. Regulation Outside of the United States For marketing outside the U.S., we are subject to foreign regulatory requirements governing human clinical testing and marketing approval for our products. These requirements vary by jurisdiction, differ from those in the U.S., and may require us to perform additional or different preclinical or clinical testing regardless of whether FDA approval has been obtained. The amount of time required to obtain necessary approvals may be longer or shorter than that required for FDA approval. In many foreign countries, pricing and reimbursement approvals are also required. Our initial focus for obtaining marketing approval outside the U.S. is typically the European Union (the EU ), Japan and China. EU Regulations and Directives generally classify healthcare products either as medicinal products, medical devices or in vitro diagnostics. The CE Mark certification for the EU requires us to receive ISO certification for the manufacture of our products. This certification comes only after the development of an all inclusive quality system, which is reviewed for compliance with ISO standards by a licensed body working within the EU. After certification is received, a technical file is developed which attests to the product compliance with EU directive 98 79 EC for in vitro diagnostic medical devices. Only after this point is the product CE marked. Japanese regulations require registration of in vitro diagnostic products with the Japanese Ministry of Health, Labor and Welfare. Chinese regulations require registration of diagnostic products with the China FDA or CFDA. Additional clinical trials are typically required for registration purposes. For products marketed in Canada, we have our independent party certification under the Canadian Medical Device Regulation. Intellectual Property The healthcare industry has traditionally placed considerable importance on obtaining and maintaining patent and trade secret protection for commercially relevant technologies, devices, products and processes. We and other companies engaged in research and development of new diagnostic products actively pursue patents for technologies that are considered novel and patentable. However, important factors, many of which are not within our control, can affect whether and to what extent patent protection in the U.S. and in other important markets worldwide is obtained. By way of example, the speed, accuracy and consistency in application of the law in a patent office within any particular jurisdiction is beyond our control and can be unpredictable. The resolution of issues such as these and their effect upon our long term success is likewise indeterminable. We have issued patents, both in the U.S. and internationally, with expiration dates ranging from the present through approximately 2032 and have patent applications pending throughout the world. It has been our policy to file for patent protection in the U.S. and other countries with significant markets, such as Western European countries and Japan, if the economics are deemed to justify such filing and our patent counsel advises that relevant patent protection may be obtained. A large number of individuals and commercial enterprises seek patent protection for technologies, products and processes in fields in or related to our areas of product development. To the extent such efforts are successful, we may be required to obtain licenses and pay significant royalties in order to exploit certain of our product strategies and avoid a material adverse effect on our business. Licenses may not be available to us at all or, if so available, may not be available on acceptable terms. We are aware of certain patents issued to various developers of diagnostic products with potential applicability to our diagnostic technology. We have licensed certain rights from certain companies to assist with the manufacturing of certain products. In the future, we expect that we will require or desire additional licenses from other parties in order to refine our products further and to allow us to develop, manufacture and market commercially viable or superior products effectively. We seek to protect our trade secrets and technology by entering into confidentiality agreements with employees and third parties (such as potential licensees, customers, strategic partners and consultants). In addition, we have implemented certain security measures in our laboratories and offices. Also, to the extent that consultants or contracting parties apply technical or scientific information independently developed by them to our projects, disputes may arise as to the proprietary rights to such data. Under many of our contractual agreements, we have agreed to indemnify the counterparty against costs and liabilities arising out of any patent infringement claims and other intellectual property claims asserted by a third party relating to products sold under those agreements. 10 Competition Competition in the development and marketing of IVD products is intense, and innovation, product development, regulatory clearance to market and commercial introduction of new IVD technologies can occur rapidly. We believe that some of the most significant competitive factors in the rapid diagnostic market include convenience, speed to result, specimen flexibility, product menu, clinical needs, price, reimbursement and product performance as well as the effective distribution, advertising, promotion and brand name recognition. The competitive factors in the central laboratory market are also significant and include price, product performance, reimbursement, compatibility with routine specimen procurement methods, and manufacturing products in testing formats that meet the workflow demands of larger volume laboratories. We believe our success will depend on our ability to remain abreast of technological advances, to develop, gain regulatory clearance and introduce technologically advanced products, to effectively market to customers a differentiated value proposition represented by our commercialized products, to maintain our brand strength and to attract and retain experienced personnel, who are in great demand. The majority of diagnostic tests requested by physicians and other healthcare providers are performed by independent clinical reference laboratories. These laboratories, we expect, will continue to compete vigorously to maintain their dominance of the testing market. In order to achieve market acceptance for our products, we will be required to continue to demonstrate that our products provide physicians and central laboratories cost effective and time saving alternatives to competitive products and technologies. Many of our current and prospective commercial competitors, including several large pharmaceutical and diversified healthcare companies, have substantially greater financial, marketing and other resources than we have. These competitors include, among others, Alere Inc. ( Alere ), Beckman Coulter Primary Care Diagnostics, Fisher Scientific Corporation ( Fisher ), Becton Dickinson and Company, Meridian Bioscience, Inc., Cepheid Inc. and Chemicon International, Inc. We also face competition from our distributors since some have created, and others may decide to create, their own products to compete with ours. Competition may also be provided from large, medium and small development companies whose portfolio and technologies are dedicated to the development of diagnostic solutions in areas of infectious diseases in which we currently have relevant market share. Human Resources As of December 31, 2015 , we had 624 employees, n1 of whom are represented by a labor union. We have experienced no work stoppages and believe that our employee relations are good. Executive Officers of Quidel Corporation The names, ages and positions of all executive officers as of December 31, 2015 are listed below, followed by a brief account of their business experience. There are no family relationships among these officers, nor any arrangements or understandings between any officer and any other person pursuant to which an officer was selected. Douglas C. Bryant , 58, was named President, Chief Executive Officer and a member of the Board of Directors in February 2009. Mr. Bryant appointment as President and Chief Executive Officer was effective on March 1, 2009. Prior to joining us, Mr. Bryant served as Executive Vice President and Chief Operating Officer at Luminex Corporation, managing its Bioscience Group, Luminex Molecular Diagnostics (Toronto), manufacturing, R&D, technical operations, and commercial operations. From 1983 to 2007, Mr. Bryant held various worldwide commercial operations positions with Abbott Laboratories including, among others Vice President of Abbott Vascular for Asia Japan, Vice President of Abbott Molecular Global Commercial Operations and Vice President of Abbott Diagnostics Global Commercial Operations. Earlier in his career with Abbott, Mr. Bryant was Vice President of Diagnostic Operations in Europe, the Middle East and Africa, and Vice President of Diagnostic Operations Asia Pacific. Mr. Bryant has over 30 years of industry experience in sales and marketing, product development, manufacturing and service and support in both the diagnostics and life sciences markets. Mr. Bryant holds a B.A. in Economics from the University of California at Davis. Randall J. Steward , 61, became our Chief Financial Officer in October 2011 Prior to joining us, Mr. Steward served as the Chief Financial Officer for Navilyst Medical, Inc, a medical device company based in Massachusetts. From 2008 to January 2011, Mr. Steward served as Chief Operating Officer for SeQual Technologies, Inc., a San Diego based medical device company, where he was responsible for all aspects of engineering, manufacturing, finance, and information systems. Prior to SeQual Technologies, Mr. Steward spent 11 years with Spectrum Brands as Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer. Mr. Steward holds a B.B.A. in Accounting from Southern Methodist University. He is also a Certified Public Accountant and a member of the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants. 11 Michael D. Abney, Jr. , 52, became our Senior Vice President, Distribution in January 2015. Prior to joining us, he served as Vice President, Channel and Distribution for ConvaTec from 2013 to 2014 and held a number of positions at PSS World Medical, Inc. from 1989 to 2013, including most recently as Vice President, Supplier Management. Mr. Abney received his B.A. degree in Finance from the University of Florida in 1989. Robert J. Bujarski, J.D. , 47, became our Senior Vice President, General Counsel and Corporate Secretary in June 2008 and in 2010 became our Senior Vice President, Business Development, General Counsel and Corporate Secretary. Mr. Bujarski previously served as our Senior Vice President, General Counsel and Corporate Secretary from March 2007 through March 2008. From July 2005 to March 2007, he was our General Counsel and Vice President. Mr. Bujarski was an associate attorney with the law firm of Gibson, Dunn & Crutcher LLP in its transactions practice group from October 2001 to July 2005. Mr. Bujarski received his B.A. degree in 1991 and his law degree in 2001 from the University of Arizona. Werner Kroll, Ph.D., 59, became our Senior Vice President, R&D in May 2014. Prior to joining us, Dr. Kroll was Vice President and Global Head Research and Innovation for Novartis Molecular since 2009. Prior to holding that position he held a variety of senior positions from 2005 to 2009 at Novartis. Dr. Kroll has also held senior positions at Bayer from 1991 to 2005. Dr. Kroll received his Ph.D. and a Diploma in Chemistry from the University of Marburg. Edward K. Russell, 48, became our Senior Vice President, Global Commercial Operations in October 2015. Prior to joining the Company, Mr. Russell was employed by Thermo Fisher Scientific, a life sciences company based in Massachusetts, and its predecessor company Life Technologies for ten years. Mr. Russell served in various leadership roles from 2005 through 2015, including North America Commercial Leader of the BioSciences Division, General Manager of Life Technologies Global Services & Support Division, and President of Life Technologies Japan. Prior to joining Life Technologies in 2005, Mr. Russell held various leadership positions at FedEx Kinko s, ExxonMobil and Toyota Lexus. Mr. Russell started his career as an officer in the U.S. Coast Guard. Mr. Russell holds a B.S. in Civil Engineering from the U.S. Coast Guard Academy and an MBA from The Wharton School, University of Pennsylvania. John D. Tamerius, Ph.D ., 70, has been our Senior Vice President, Strategic and External Affairs since October 2015. Dr. Tamerius previously served as the Company Vice President, Clinical Regulatory Affairs from 2005 to November 2008 and Senior Vice President, Clinical Regulatory Affairs from November 2008 to October 2015. Dr. Tamerius has held a variety of positions with us including, among others Vice President for Research and Development and General Manager of the Company Specialty Products Group. Dr. Tamerius joined the Company in 1983 with the acquisition of Cytotech, Inc. where he served as President. Dr. Tamerius was previously a research associate at Scripps Clinic and Research Foundation. Dr. Tamerius performed postdoctoral research in tumor immunology at the Fred Hutchinson Cancer Center in Seattle and was awarded a Bachelor of Science, Master of Science, and Doctor of Philosophy in Microbiology and Immunology, all from the University of Washington. 12 Item 1A. Risk Factors Risks Related to Our Business Our operating results may fluctuate adversely as a result of many factors that are outside our control, which may negatively impact our stock price. Fluctuations in our operating results, for any reason, could cause our growth or operating results to fall below the expectations of investors and securities analysts. We base the scope of our operations and related expenses on our estimates of future revenues. A significant portion of our operating expenses are fixed, and we may not be able to rapidly adjust our expenses if our revenues fall short of our expectations. Our revenue estimates for future periods are based, among other factors, on estimated end user demand for our products. If end user consumption is less than estimated, revenues from our distribution partners and other distribution channels would be expected to fall short of expectations, and because such a significant portion of our costs are fixed, could result in operating losses. Factors that are beyond our control and that could affect our operating results in the future include seasonal fluctuations in our sales of infectious disease tests, which are generally highest in fall and winter, thus resulting in generally lower operating results in the second and third calendar quarters and higher operating results in the first and fourth calendar quarters; timing of the onset, length and severity of the cold and flu seasons; government and media attention focused on influenza and the related potential impact on humans from novel influenza viruses, such as H1N1 and avian flu; changes in the level of competition, such as would occur if 1 of our competitors introduced a new, better performing or lower priced product to compete with 1 of our products; changes in the reimbursement systems or reimbursement amounts that end users rely upon in choosing to use our products; changes in economic conditions in our domestic and international markets, such as economic downturns, decreased healthcare spending, reduced consumer demand, inflation and currency fluctuations; changes in government laws and regulations affecting our business; lower than anticipated market penetration of our new or more recently introduced products; significant quantities of our product or that of our competitors in our distributors inventories or distribution channels; changes in distributor buying patterns; and changes in the healthcare market including consolidation in our customer base. Our operating results are heavily dependent on sales of our influenza diagnostic tests. Although we continue to diversify our products, a significant percentage of our total revenues still continue to come from a limited number of our product families. In particular, revenues from the sale of our influenza tests represent a significant portion of our total revenues and are expected to remain so for at least the near future. In addition, the gross margins derived from sales of our influenza tests are significantly higher than the gross margins from our other core products. As a result, if sales or revenues of our influenza tests decline for any reason whether as a result of market share loss or price pressure, obsolescence, a mild flu season, regulatory matters or any other reason our operating results would be materially and adversely affected on a disproportionate basis. For the years ended December 31, 2015 , 2014 and 2013 , sales of our infectious disease products (including influenza test sales) accounted for 72% , 71% , and 72% respectively, of total revenue. To remain competitive, we must continue to develop, obtain and protect our proprietary technology rights; otherwise, we may lose market share or need to reduce prices as a result of competitors selling technologically superior products that compete with our products. Our ability to compete successfully in the diagnostic market depends on continued development and introduction of new proprietary technology and the improvement of existing technology. If we cannot continue to improve upon or develop, obtain and protect proprietary technology, our operating results could be adversely affected. 13 Our competitive position is heavily dependent on obtaining and protecting our own proprietary technology or obtaining licenses from others. Our ability to obtain patents and licenses, and their benefits, is uncertain. We have issued patents both in the U.S. and internationally, with expiration dates ranging from the present through approximately 2032 In addition to our patents in the U.S., we have patents issued in various other countries including, among others, Australia, Canada, Japan and various European countries, including France, Germany, Italy, Spain and the United Kingdom. Additionally, we have patent applications pending in the U.S. and various foreign jurisdictions. These pending patent applications may not result in the issuance of any patents, or if issued, may not have priority over others applications or may not offer meaningful protection against competitors with similar technology or may not otherwise provide commercial value. Moreover, any patents issued to us may be challenged, invalidated, found unenforceable or circumvented in the future. Third parties can make, use and sell products covered by our patents in any country in which we do not have patent protection. We also license the right to use our products to our customers under label licenses that are for research purposes only. These licenses could be contested and, because we cannot monitor all potential unauthorized uses of our products around the world, we might not be aware of an unauthorized use or might not be able to enforce the license restrictions in a cost effective manner. Our current and future licenses may not be adequate for the operation of our business. In the future, we expect that we will require or desire additional licenses from other parties in order to refine our products further and to allow us to develop, manufacture and market commercially viable or superior products. We may not be able to obtain licenses for technology patented by others and required to produce our products on commercially reasonable terms, if at all. To protect or enforce our patent rights, it may be necessary for us to initiate patent litigation proceedings against third parties, such as infringement suits or interference proceedings. These lawsuits would be expensive, take significant time and would divert management attention from other business concerns. In the event that we seek to enforce any of our patents against an infringing party, it is likely that the party defending the claim will seek to invalidate the patents we assert, which could put our patents at risk of being invalidated, held unenforceable, or interpreted narrowly, and our patent applications at risk of not being issued. Further, these lawsuits may provoke the defendants to assert claims against us. If we pursue any such claim, we cannot assure you that we will prevail in any of such suits or proceedings or that the damages or other remedies awarded to us, if any, will be economically valuable. In addition to our patents, we rely on confidentiality agreements and other similar arrangements with our employees and other persons who have access to our proprietary and confidential information, together with trade secrets and other common law rights, to protect our proprietary and confidential technology. These agreements and laws may not provide meaningful protection for our proprietary technology in the event of unauthorized use or disclosure of such information or in the event that our competitors independently develop technologies that are substantially equivalent or superior to ours. Moreover, the laws of some foreign jurisdictions may not protect intellectual property rights to the same extent as those in the U.S. In the event of unauthorized use or disclosure of such information, if we encounter difficulties or are otherwise unable to effectively protect our intellectual property rights domestically or in foreign jurisdictions, our business, operating results and financial condition could be materially and adversely affected. In order to remain competitive and profitable, we must expend considerable resources to research new technologies and products and develop new markets, and there is no assurance our efforts to develop new technologies, products or markets will be successful or such technologies, products or markets will be commercially viable. We devote a significant amount of financial and other resources to researching and developing new technologies, new products and new markets. The development, manufacture and sale of diagnostic products requires a significant investment of resources. The development of new markets also requires a substantial investment of resources, such as new employees, offices and manufacturing facilities. No assurances can be given that our efforts to develop new technologies or products will be successful, that such technologies and products will be commercially viable, or our expansion into new markets will be profitable. We expect to incur increased operating expenses as a result of our increased investment in sales and marketing activities, manufacturing scale up and new product development associated with our efforts to accomplish our business strategies discussed in Business Business Strategy in of this Annual Report. No assurance can be given that we will be successful in implementing our operational, growth and other strategic efforts. In addition, the funds for our strategic development projects have in the past come primarily from our business operations and our working capital line of credit and the sale of debt securities. If our business slows and we become less profitable, and as a result have less m1y available to 14 fund research and development, we may have to reduce or eliminate programs. Similarly, if adequate financial, personnel, equipment or other resources are not available, we may be required to delay or scale back our strategic efforts. Our operations will be adversely affected if our operating results do not correspondingly increase with our increased expenditures or if our technology, product and market development efforts are unsuccessful or delayed. Furthermore, our failure to successfully introduce new technologies or products and develop new markets could have a material adverse effect on our business and prospects. We rely on a limited number of key distributors that account for a substantial majority of our total revenue. The loss of any key distributor or an unsuccessful effort by us to directly distribute our products could lead to reduced sales. Although we have many distributor relationships in the U.S., the market is dominated by a small number of these distributors. 3 of our distributors, which are considered to be among the market leaders, collectively accounted (each individually in excess of 10%) for approximately 48% , 48% , and 43% of our total revenue for the years ended December 31, 2015 , 2014 and 2013 , respectively. In addition, we rely on a few key distributors for a majority of our international sales, and expect to continue to do so for the foreseeable future. The loss or termination of our relationship with any of these key distributors could significantly disrupt our business unless suitable alternatives are timely found or lost sales to 1 distributor are absorbed by another distributor. Finding a suitable alternative to a lost or terminated distributor may pose challenges in our industry competitive environment, and another suitable distributor may not be found on satisfactory terms, if at all. For instance, some distributors already have exclusive arrangements with our competitors, and others do not have the same level of penetration into our target markets as our existing distributors. If total revenue from these or any of our other significant distributors were to decrease in any material amount in the future or we are not successful in timely transitioning business to new distributors, our business, operating results and financial condition could be materially and adversely affected. If we are not able to manage our growth strategy or if we experience difficulties identifying or integrating companies or technologies we may acquire, our operating results may be adversely affected. Our business strategy contemplates further growth, which would likely result in expanding the scope of operating and financial systems and the geographical area of our operations, including further expansion outside the U.S., as new products and technologies are developed and commercialized or new geographical markets are entered. Because we have a relatively small executive staff, acquisitions and other future growth may divert management attention from other aspects of our business, and place a strain on existing management and our operational, financial and management information systems. Furthermore, we may expand into markets in which we have less experience or incur higher costs. Some of our growth is expected to come from acquisitions of businesses and technologies. However, we cannot be certain that we will be able to identify attractive acquisition targets, obtain financing for acquisitions on satisfactory terms or successfully acquire identified targets. Additionally, we may experience difficulties integrating the operations of companies or technologies that we may acquire, with our own operations, and we may not realize our anticipated benefits and cost savings within our expected time frame, or at all. We can give no assurance that we will be able to successfully identify, complete and integrate strategic acquisitions. Should we encounter difficulties in managing these tasks and risks, our growth strategy may suffer and our revenue and profitability could be adversely affected. Intellectual property risks and third party claims of infringement, misappropriation of proprietary rights or other claims against us could adversely affect our ability to market our products, require us to redesign our products or attempt to seek licenses from third parties, and materially adversely affect our operating results. In addition, the defense of such claims could result in significant costs and divert the attention of our management and other key employees. Companies in or related to our industry often aggressively protect and pursue their intellectual property rights. There are often intellectual property risks associated with developing and producing new products and entering new markets, and we may not be able to obtain, at reasonable cost or upon commercially reasonable terms, if at all, licenses to intellectual property of others that is alleged to be part of such new or existing products. From time to time, we have received, and may continue to receive, notices that claim we have infringed upon, misappropriated or misused other parties proprietary rights. We have hired and will continue to hire individuals or contractors who have experience in medical diagnostics and these individuals or contractors may have confidential trade secret or proprietary information of third parties. We cannot assure you that these individuals or contractors will not use this third party information in connection with performing services for us or otherwise reveal this third party information to us. Thus, we could be sued for misappropriation of proprietary information and trade secrets. Such claims are expensive to defend and could divert our attention and result in substantial damage awards and injunctions that could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition or results of operations. In addition, to 15 the extent that individuals or contractors apply technical or scientific information independently developed by them to our projects, disputes may arise as to the proprietary rights to such data and may result in litigation. Moreover, in the past we have been engaged in litigation with parties that claim, among other matters, that we infringed their patents. The defense and prosecution of patent and trade secret claims are both costly and time consuming. We or our customers may be sued by other parties that claim that our products have infringed their patents or misappropriated their proprietary rights or that may seek to invalidate 1 or more of our patents. An adverse determination in any of these types of disputes could prevent us from manufacturing or selling some of our products, limit or restrict the type of work that employees involved with such products may perform for us, increase our costs and expose us to significant liability. As a general matter, our involvement in litigation or in any claims to determine proprietary rights, as may arise from time to time, could materially and adversely affect our business, financial condition and results of operations for reasons such as pending litigation may of itself cause our distributors or end users to reduce or terminate purchases of our products; it may consume a substantial portion of our managerial and financial resources; its outcome would be uncertain and a court may find any third party patent claims valid and infringed by our products (issuing a preliminary or permanent injunction) that would require us to procure costly licensing arrangements from third parties or withdraw or recall such products from the market, redesign such products offered for sale or under development or restrict employees from performing work in their areas of expertise; governmental agencies may commence investigations or criminal proceedings against our employees, former employees and us relating to claims of misappropriation or misuse of another party proprietary rights; an adverse outcome could subject us to significant liability in the form of past royalty payments, penalties, special and punitive damages, the opposing party attorneys' fees, and future royalty payments significantly affecting our future earnings; and failure to obtain a necessary license (upon commercially reasonable terms, if at all) upon an adverse outcome could prevent us from selling our current products or other products we may develop. Even if licenses to intellectual property rights are available, they can be costly. We have entered into various licensing agreements, which largely require payments based on specified product sales as well as the achievement of specific milest1s. Royalty and license expenses under these arrangements collectively totaled $11 million , $8.9 million and $9.0 million for the years ended December 31, 2015 , 2014 and 2013 , respectively. In addition to the foregoing, we may also be required to indemnify some customers, distributors and strategic partners under our agreements with such parties if a third party alleges or if a court finds that our products or activities have infringed upon, misappropriated or misused another person proprietary rights. Further, our products may contain technology provided to us by other parties such as contractors, suppliers or customers. We may have little or no ability to determine in advance whether such technology infringes the intellectual property rights of a third party. Our contractors, suppliers and licensors may not be required or financially able to indemnify us in the event that a claim of infringement is asserted against us, or they may be required to indemnify us only up to a maximum amount, above which we would be responsible for any further costs or damages. Servicing our debt requires a significant amount of cash, and we may not have sufficient cash flow from our business to pay our debt. Our ability to make scheduled payments of the principal of, to pay interest on, or to refinance our indebtedness, including cash due upon conversion of our Convertible Senior Notes ("Convertible Senior Notes"), depends on our future performance, which is subject to economic, financial, competitive and other factors beyond our control. Our business may not continue to generate cash flow from operations in the future sufficient to service our debt. If we are unable to generate such cash flow, we may be required to adopt 1 or more alternatives, such as reducing capital expenditures, selling assets, restructuring debt or obtaining additional equity capital on terms that may be 1rous or highly dilutive. Our ability to refinance our indebtedness will depend on the capital markets and our financial condition at such time. We may not be able to engage in any of these activities or engage in these activities on desirable terms, which could result in a default on our debt obligations. 16 We may not have the ability to raise the funds necessary to settle conversions of our Convertible Senior Notes or purchase the Convertible Senior Notes as required upon a fundamental change, and our existing debt contains, and our future debt may contain, limitations on our ability to pay cash upon conversion or purchase of our Convertible Senior Notes. Following a fundamental change (as defined in the indenture to our Convertible Senior Notes), the holders of our Convertible Senior Notes will have the right to require us to purchase their notes for cash. Certain fundamental changes and the exercise of any repurchase right of Convertible Senior Note holders upon a fundamental change would result in an event of default under our existing Senior Credit Facility. A fundamental change may also constitute an event of default or prepayment under, and result in the acceleration of the maturity of, our other then existing indebtedness. In addition, upon conversion of the Convertible Senior Notes, unless we settle our conversion obligation solely in shares of our common stock (other than cash in lieu of any fractional share), we will be required to make cash payments in respect of the Convertible Senior Notes being surrendered for conversion. We may not have sufficient financial resources, or be able to arrange financing, to pay the fundamental change purchase price in cash with respect to any Convertible Senior Notes surrendered by holders for purchase upon a fundamental change or make cash payments upon conversions. In addition, restrictions in our current or then existing credit facilities or other indebtedness, if any, may not allow us to purchase the Convertible Senior Notes upon a fundamental change or make cash payments upon conversions of the Convertible Senior Notes (including, as noted above, restrictions in our existing Senior Credit Facility on the repurchase of Convertible Senior Notes upon a fundamental change). Our failure to purchase the Convertible Senior Notes upon a fundamental change or make cash payments upon conversions thereof when required would result in an event of default with respect to the Convertible Senior Notes which could, in turn, constitute a default under the terms of our other indebtedness. If the repayment of the related indebtedness were to be accelerated after any applicable notice or grace periods, we may not have sufficient funds to repay the indebtedness and purchase the Convertible Senior Notes or make cash payments upon conversions thereof. The conditional conversion feature of our Convertible Senior Notes, if triggered, may adversely affect our financial condition and operating results. In the event the conditional conversion feature of the Convertible Senior Notes is triggered, holders of Convertible Senior Notes will be entitled to convert their Convertible Senior Notes at any time during specified periods at their option. If 1 or more Convertible Senior Note holders elects to convert their notes, unless we satisfy our conversion obligation by delivering solely shares of our common stock, we would be required to settle all or a portion of our conversion obligation through the payment of cash, which could adversely affect our liquidity. Furthermore, even if Convertible Senior Note holders did not elect to convert their notes, we could be required under applicable accounting rules to reclassify all or a portion of the outstanding principal of the Convertible Senior Notes as a current rather than long term liability, which would result in a material reduction of our net working capital. Our Senior Credit Facility imposes restrictions on our operations and activities, limits the amount we can borrow, and requires us to comply with various financial covenants. On August 10, 2012, we entered into an amended and restated $140.0 million senior secured syndicated credit facility, as amended (the Senior Credit Facility ), which matures on August 10, 2017. The agreement governing the Senior Credit Facility is subject to certain customary covenants, including among others limitations on liens; mergers, consolidations and sales of assets; debt; dividends, stock redemptions and the redemption and or prepayment of other debt; investments (including loans and advances) and acquisitions; transactions with affiliates; and disposition of assets. We are also subject to financial covenants which include a funded debt to adjusted earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization, and stock based compensation ( adjusted EBITDA ) ratio (as defined in the Senior Credit Facility) and an interest coverage ratio. The Senior Credit Facility is secured by substantially all of our present and future assets and properties. If we fail to comply with these covenants, our Senior Credit Facility could become due and payable prior to maturity. As of December 31, 2015 , we were in compliance with all financial covenants. We will continue to have the ability to incur debt and our levels of debt may affect our operations and our ability to pay the principal of and interest on our debt. We and our subsidiaries may be able to incur substantial additional debt in the future, subject to the restrictions contained in our debt instruments. As of December 31, 2015 , we had $126.1 million available to borrow under the Senior Credit Facility. Our ability to borrow under the Senior Credit Facility fluctuates from time to time due to, among other factors, our borrowings under the facility and our funded debt to adjusted EBITDA ratio as measured under the Senior Credit Facility. As of December 31, 2015 , there were no borrowings outstanding under the Senior Credit Facility. 17 Our indebtedness could be costly or have adverse consequences, such as requiring us to dedicate a substantial portion of our cash flows from operations to payments on our debt; limiting our ability to obtain future financing for working capital, capital expenditures, acquisitions, debt obligations and other general corporate requirements; making us more vulnerable to adverse conditions in the general economy or our industry and to fluctuations in our operating results, including affecting our ability to comply with and maintain any financial tests and ratios required under our indebtedness; limiting our flexibility to engage in certain transactions or to plan for, or react to, changes in our business and the diagnostics industry; putting us at a disadvantage compared to competitors that have less relative and or less restrictive debt; and subjecting us to additional restrictive financial and other covenants. If we incur substantial additional indebtedness in the future, these higher levels of indebtedness may affect our ability to pay the principal of and interest on existing indebtedness and our credi2rthiness generally. We may need to raise additional funds to finance our future capital or operating needs, which could have adverse consequences on our operations and the interests of our stockholders. Seasonal fluctuations in our operating results could limit the cash we have available for research and development and other operating needs or cause us to fail to comply with financial covenants in the documents governing our indebtedness. As a result, we may not be able to draw on our Senior Credit Facility and we may need to seek to raise funds through public or private debt or sale of equity to achieve our business strategy or to avoid non compliance with our financial covenants. In addition, we may need funds to complete acquisitions, or may issue equity in connection with acquisitions. If we raise funds or acquire other technologies or businesses through issuance of equity, this could dilute the interests of our stockholders. Moreover, the availability of additional capital, whether debt or equity from private capital sources (including banks) or the public capital markets, fluctuates as our financial condition and industry or market conditions in general change. There may be times when the private capital markets and the public debt or equity markets lack sufficient liquidity or when our securities cannot be sold at attractive prices, in which case we would not be able to access capital from these sources on favorable terms, if at all. We can give no assurance as to the terms or availability of additional capital. Volatility and disruption to the global capital and credit markets may adversely affect our results of operations and financial condition, as well as our ability to access credit and the financial soundness of our customers and suppliers. During the most recent recession, the global capital and credit markets experienced a period of unprecedented turmoil and upheaval, characterized by the bankruptcy, failure, collapse or sale of various financial institutions and an unprecedented level of intervention from the U.S. federal government. If these conditions recur, it could adversely affect the demand for our products and services and, therefore, reduce purchases by our customers, which would negatively affect our results of operations and financial condition. In addition, interest rate fluctuations, financial market volatility or credit market disruptions may limit our access to capital, and may also negatively affect our customers and our suppliers ability to obtain credit to finance their businesses. As a result, our customers needs and ability to purchase our products or services may decrease, and our suppliers may increase their prices, reduce their output or change their terms of sale. If our customers or suppliers operating and financial performance deteriorates, or if they are unable to make scheduled payments or obtain credit, our customers may not be able to pay, or may delay payment of, accounts receivable owed to us, and our suppliers may restrict credit or impose different payment terms or reduce or terminate production of products they supply to us. Any inability of customers to pay us for our products and services, or any demands by suppliers for different payment terms, may adversely affect our operating results and financial condition. Additionally, both state and federal government sponsored and private payers, as a result of budget deficits or reductions, may seek to reduce their healthcare expenditures by renegotiating their contracts with us. Any reduction in payments by such government sponsored or private payers may adversely affect our earnings and cash flow. Declining economic conditions may also increase our costs. We may not achieve market acceptance of our products among healthcare providers and physicians, and this would have a negative effect on future sales. A large part of our business is based on the sale of rapid POC diagnostic tests. Our future sales depend on, among other matters, capture of sales from central laboratories by achieving market acceptance of POC testing from physicians and other healthcare providers. If we do not capture sales at the levels anticipated in our budget, our total revenue will not be at the levels that we expect and the costs we incur or have incurred will be disproportionate to our sales levels. We expect that clinical reference and hospital based laboratories will continue to compete vigorously against our POC diagnostic products in order to 18 maintain and expand their existing dominance of the overall diagnostic testing market. Moreover, even if we can demonstrate that our products are more cost effective, save time, or have better performance , physicians and other healthcare providers may resist changing to POC tests. We also believe that adoption of some of our products may be faster if the products are granted a CLIA waiver. On January 30, 2008, the FDA issued guidance setting forth new requirements for obtaining a CLIA waiver that are 1rous and have increased the time and cost required to obtain a CLIA waiver. Our failure to achieve market acceptance from physicians and healthcare providers with respect to the use of our POC diagnostic products would have a negative effect on our future sales. The industry and market segment in which we operate are highly competitive, and intense competition with other providers of diagnostic products may reduce our sales and margins. Our diagnostic tests compete with similar products made by our competitors. There are a large number of multinational and regional competitors making investments in competing technologies and products, including several large pharmaceutical and diversified healthcare companies. We also face competition from our distributors as some have created, and others may decide to create, their own products to compete with ours. A number of our competitors have a potential competitive advantage because they have substantially greater financial, technical, research and other resources, and larger, more established marketing, sales, distribution and service organizations than we have. Moreover, some competitors offer broader product lines and have greater name recognition than we have. If our competitors products are more effective than ours or take market share from our products through more effective marketing or competitive pricing, our operating results could be materially and adversely affected. In addition, there has been a trend toward industry consolidation in our markets over the last few years. We may not be able to compete successfully in an increasingly consolidated industry. We expect this trend toward industry consolidation may continue as companies attempt to strengthen or hold their market positions in an evolving industry and as companies are acquired or are unable to continue operations. Our business and products are highly regulated by various governmental agencies. Our results of operations would be negatively affected by failures or delays in the receipt of regulatory approvals or clearances, the loss of previously received approvals or other changes to the existing laws and regulations that adversely impact our ability to manufacture and market our products. The testing, manufacture and sale of our products are subject to regulation by numerous governmental authorities in the U.S., principally the FDA and corresponding state and foreign regulatory agencies. The FDA regulates most of our products, which are currently all Class I or II devices. The U.S. Department of Agriculture regulates our veterinary products. Our future performance depends on, among other matters, if, when and at what cost we will receive regulatory approval for new products. Regulatory review can be a lengthy, expensive and uncertain process, making the timing and costs of clearances and approvals difficult to predict. In addition, certain of our foreign product registrations are owned or controlled by our international distribution partners, such that any change in our arrangement with such partners could result in the loss of or delay in transfer of any such product registrations, thereby interrupting our ability to sell our products in those markets. Our results of operations would be negatively affected by failures or delays in the receipt of regulatory approvals or clearances, the loss of previously received approvals or clearances or the placement of limits on the marketing and use of our products. For example, the FDA has recently proposed reclassifications of rapid influenza detection devices from Class I to Class II devices. If such reclassifications affected our ability to market 1 or more of our rapid influenza products, our total revenue may be negatively affected. Furthermore, in the ordinary course of business, we must frequently make subjective judgments with respect to compliance with applicable laws and regulations. If regulators subsequently disagree with the manner in which we have sought to comply with these regulations, we could be subjected to substantial civil and criminal penalties, as well as field corrective actions, product recall, seizure or injunction with respect to the sale of our products. The assessment of any civil and criminal penalties against us could severely impair our reputation within the industry and affect our operating results, and any limitation on our ability to manufacture and market our products could also have a material adverse effect on our business. Changes in government policy could adversely affect our business and profitability. Changes in government policy could have a significant impact on our business by increasing the cost of doing business, affecting our ability to sell our products and negatively impacting our profitability. Such changes could include modifications to existing legislation, such as U.S. tax policy, or entirely new legislation, such as the Affordable Healthcare Act in the U.S. Although we cannot fully predict the many ways that healthcare reform might affect our business, the law imposed a 23% medical device excise tax (MDET) on certain transactions, including many U.S. sales of medical devices, which includes the majority of our US product sales. This tax took effect January 1, 2013 For the years ended December 31, 2015 and 2014 , we incurred $21 million and $20 million related to the MDET, respectively. On December 18, 2015, legislation was passed to suspend the 23% MDET for a period of 2 years. It is unclear whether and to what extent, if at all, other anticipated 19 developments resulting from healthcare reform, such as an increase in the number of people with health insurance, may impact us. We are subject to numerous government regulations in addition to FDA regulation, and compliance with laws, including changed or new laws, could increase our costs and adversely affect our operations. In addition to FDA and other regulations referred to above, numerous laws relating to such matters as safe working conditions, manufacturing practices, data privacy, environmental protection, fire hazard control and disposal of hazardous or potentially hazardous substances impact our business operations. If these laws or their interpretation change or new laws regulating any of our businesses are adopted, the costs of compliance with these laws could substantially increase our overall costs. Failure to comply with any laws, including laws regulating the manufacture and marketing of our products, could result in substantial costs and loss of sales or customers. Because of the number and extent of the laws and regulations affecting our industry, and the number of governmental agencies whose actions could affect our operations, it is impossible to reliably predict the full nature and impact of future legislation or regulatory developments relating to our industry and our products. To the extent the costs and procedures associated with meeting new or changing requirements are substantial, our business, results of operations and financial condition could be adversely affected. We use hazardous materials in our business that may result in unexpected and substantial claims against us relating to handling, storage or disposal. Our research and development and manufacturing activities involve the controlled use of hazardous materials. Federal, state and local laws and regulations govern the use, manufacture, storage, handling and disposal of hazardous materials. These regulations include federal statutes commonly known as CERCLA, RCRA and the Clean Water Act. Compliance with these laws and regulations is already expensive. If any governmental authorities were to impose new environmental regulations requiring compliance in addition to that required by existing regulations, or alter their interpretation of the requirements of such regulations, such environmental regulations could impair our research, development or production efforts by imposing additional, and possibly substantial, costs, restrictions or compliance procedures on our business. In addition, because of the nature of the penalties provided for in some of these environmental regulations, we could be required to pay sizable fines, penalties or damages in the event of noncompliance with environmental laws. Any environmental violation or remediation requirement could also partially or completely shut down our research and manufacturing facilities and operations, which would have a material adverse effect on our business. The risk of accidental contamination or injury from these hazardous materials cannot be completely eliminated and exposure of individuals to these materials could result in substantial fines, penalties or damages that are not covered by insurance. Our total revenue could be affected by third party reimbursement policies and potential cost constraints. The end users of our products are primarily physicians and other healthcare providers. In the U.S., healthcare providers such as hospitals and physicians who purchase diagnostic products generally rely on third party payers, principally private health insurance plans, federal Medicare and state Medicaid, to reimburse all or part of the cost of the procedure. Use of our products would be adversely impacted if physicians and other healthcare providers do not receive adequate reimbursement for the cost of our products by their patients third party payers. Our total revenue could also be adversely affected by changes or trends in reimbursement policies of these governmental or private healthcare payers. We believe that the overall escalating cost of medical products and services has led to, and will continue to lead to, increased pressures on the healthcare industry, both foreign and domestic, to reduce the cost of products and services. Given the efforts to control and reduce healthcare costs in the U.S. in recent years, currently available levels of reimbursement may not continue to be available in the future for our existing products or products under development. Third party reimbursement and coverage may not be available or adequate in either the U.S. or foreign markets, current reimbursement amounts may be decreased in the future and future legislation, regulation or reimbursement policies of third party payers may reduce the demand for our products or adversely impact our ability to sell our products on a profitable basis. Unexpected increases in, or inability to meet, demand for our products could require us to spend considerable resources to meet the demand or harm our reputation and customer relationships if we are unable to meet demand. Our inability to meet customer demand for our products, whether as a result of manufacturing problems or supply shortfalls, could harm our customer relationships and impair our reputation within the industry. In addition, our product manufacturing of certain product lines is concentrated in 1 or more of our manufacturing sites. Weather, natural disasters (including pandemics), fires, terrorism, political change, failure to follow specific internal protocols and procedures, equipment malfunction, environmental factors or damage to 1 or more of our facilities could adversely affect our ability to manufacture our products. This, in turn, could have a material adverse effect on our business. 20 If we experience unexpected increases in the demand for our products, we may be required to expend additional capital resources to meet these demands. These capital resources could involve the cost of new machinery or even the cost of new manufacturing facilities. This would increase our capital costs, which could adversely affect our earnings and cash resources. If we are unable to develop or obtain necessary manufacturing capabilities in a timely manner, our total revenue could be adversely affected. Failure to cost effectively increase production volumes, if required, or lower than anticipated yields or production problems, including those encountered as a result of changes that we may make in our manufacturing processes to meet increased demand or changes in applicable laws and regulations, could result in shipment delays as well as increased manufacturing costs, which could also have a material adverse effect on our business, operating results and financial condition. Unexpected increases in demand for our products could also require us to obtain additional raw materials in order to manufacture products to meet the demand. Some raw materials require significant ordering lead time and we may not be able to timely access sufficient raw materials in the event of an unexpected increase in demand, particularly those obtained from a sole supplier or a limited group of suppliers. Interruptions in the supply of raw materials and other products and services could adversely affect our operations and financial results. We depend on third party manufacturers and suppliers for some of our products, or comp1nts and materials used in our products. Some of our raw materials, equipment and comp1nts are currently obtained from a sole supplier or a limited group of suppliers. We have long term supply agreements with many of these suppliers, but these long term agreements involve risks for us, such as our potential inability to obtain an adequate supply of quality raw materials, equipment or comp1nts and our reduced control over pricing, quality and timely delivery. It is also possible that 1 or more of these suppliers may become unwilling or unable to deliver materials or comp1nts to us. In addition, due to regulatory requirements relating to the qualification of suppliers, we may not be able to establish additional or replacement sources on a timely basis or without excessive cost. Any shortfall in our supply of raw materials, equipment or comp1nts, or our inability to quickly and cost effectively obtain alternative sources for this supply, could have a material adverse effect on our business and operating results. In addition, we use third party packaging companies to ship our products to customers. An interruption in the businesses of these third party packaging companies could result in a delay of shipments to customers. If 1 or more of our products is claimed to be defective, we could be subject to claims of liability and harm to our reputation that could adversely affect our business. A claim of a defect in the design or manufacture of our products could have a material adverse effect on our reputation in the industry and subject us to claims of liability for injuries and otherwise. Any substantial underinsured loss resulting from such a claim would have a material adverse effect on our operating results and the damage to our reputation or product lines in the industry could have a material adverse effect on our business. We are exposed to business risk which, if not covered by insurance, could have an adverse effect on our results of operations. We face a number of business risks, including exposure to product liability claims. Although we maintain insurance for a number of these risks, we may face claims for types of damages, or for amounts of damages, that are not covered by our insurance. For example, although we currently carry product liability insurance for liability losses, there is a risk that product liability or other claims may exceed the amount of our insurance coverage or may be excluded from coverage under the terms of our policy. Also, our existing insurance may not be renewed at the same cost and level of coverage as currently in effect, or may not be renewed at all. Further, we do not currently have insurance against many environmental risks we confront in our business. If we are held liable for a claim against which we are not insured or for damages exceeding the limits of our insurance coverage, whether arising out of product liability matters or from some other matter, that claim could have a material adverse effect on our results of operations. Failures in our information technology and storage systems could significantly disrupt our business or force us to expend excessive costs. We utilize complex information technology systems to support our business. We cannot be sure that our systems will meet our future business needs or that necessary upgrades will operate as designed, which could result in excessive costs or disruptions in portions of our business. In particular, any disruptions, delays or deficiencies caused by our enterprise resource planning system could adversely affect our ability to process orders, ship products, provide services and customer support, send invoices and track payments, fulfill contractual obligations or otherwise operate our business. In addition, despite the implementation of security measures, information technology systems are vulnerable to damage from a variety of sources, 21 including computer viruses, unauthorized access, telecommunications or ne2rk failures, malicious human acts, terrorism and natural disasters. Moreover, despite ne2rk security and back up measures, some of our servers are potentially vulnerable to physical or electronic break ins, computer viruses and similar disruptive problems. Despite the precautionary measures we have taken to prevent unanticipated problems that could affect our systems, sustained or repeated system failures that interrupt our ability to generate and maintain data, could result in a material disruption in our operations. Furthermore, to the extent that any disruption or security breach resulted in a loss of or damage to our data or applications, or inappropriate disclosure of confidential or proprietary information, we could face a variety of negative consequences, including regulatory actions or litigation, fines or penalties, adverse publicity, increased cybersecurity protection costs, and lost revenue. Our business could be negatively affected by the loss of or the inability to hire key personnel. Our future success depends in part on our ability to retain our key technical, sales, marketing and executive personnel and our ability to identify and hire additional qualified personnel. Competition for these personnel is intense, both in the industry in which we operate and where our operations are located. Further, we expect to grow our operations, and our needs for additional management and other key personnel are expected to increase. If we are not able to retain existing key personnel, or timely identify and hire replacement or additional qualified personnel to meet expected growth, our business could be adversely impacted. In addition, the loss of any of our key personnel, particularly key research and development personnel, could harm our business and prospects and could impede the achievement our research and development, operation or strategic objectives. We face risks relating to our international sales, including inherent economic, political and regulatory risks, which could impact our financial performance, cause interruptions in our current business operations and impede our growth strategy. Our products are sold internationally, with the majority of our international sales to our customers in Europe and Asia Pacific. We currently sell and market our products through distributor organizations and sales agents. Sales to foreign customers accounted for 14% , 13% , and 13% of our total revenue for the years ended December 31, 2015 , 2014 and 2013 , respectively. Our international sales are subject to inherent economic, political and regulatory risks, which could impact our financial performance, cause interruptions in our current business operations and impede our international growth. These foreign risks include, among others compliance with multiple different registration requirements and new and changing registration requirements, our inability to benefit from registration for our products inasmuch as registrations may be controlled by a distributor, and the difficulty in transitioning our product registrations; compliance with complex foreign and U.S. laws and regulations that apply to our international operations, including U.S. laws such as import export limitations, the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act, and local laws prohibiting corrupt payments to governmental officials, could expose us or our employees to fines and criminal sanctions and damage our reputation; tariffs or other barriers as we continue to expand into new countries and geographic regions; exposure to currency exchange fluctuations against the U.S. dollar; longer payment cycles, generally lower average selling prices and greater difficulty in accounts receivable collection; reduced, or lack of, protection for, and enforcement of, intellectual property rights; political and economic instability in some of the regions where we currently sell our products or that we may expand into in the future; complex and potentially adverse tax consequences; and diversion to the U.S. of our products sold into international markets at lower prices. Currently, the majority of our international sales are negotiated for and paid in U.S. dollars. N1theless, these sales are subject to currency risks, since changes in the values of foreign currencies relative to the value of the U.S. dollar can render our products comparatively more expensive. These exchange rate fluctuations could negatively impact international sales of our products, as could changes in the general economic conditions in those markets. In order to maintain a competitive price for our products internationally, we may have to continue to provide discounts or otherwise effectively reduce our prices, resulting in a lower margin on products sold internationally. Continued change in the values of the Euro, the Japanese Yen and other foreign currencies could have a negative impact on our business, financial condition and results of operations. In addition, we have certain supply agreements with foreign vendors whereby we share the foreign currency exchange fluctuation risk. We may, in the future, enter into similar arrangements. 22 Sales of our common stock in the public market could lower the market price for our common stock and adversely impact the trading price of our securities. We may need to seek additional capital. If this additional financing is obtained through the issuance of equity securities, debt convertible into equity or options or warrants to acquire equity securities, our existing stockholders could experience significant dilution upon the issuance, conversion or exercise of such securities. In addition, a substantial number of shares of our common stock is reserved for issuance upon the conversion of our Convertible Senior Notes, exercise of stock options and vesting of other equity awards. In addition, the issuance of additional shares of our common stock, or issuances of additional securities convertible into or exercisable for shares of our common stock or other equity linked securities, including, convertible debt, preferred stock or warrants, could dilute the ownership interest of our common stockholders and could depress the market price of shares of our common stock and impair our ability to raise capital through the sale of additional equity securities. We cannot predict the size of future issuances or the effect, if any, that they may have on the market price for our common stock. We also have a number of institutional stockholders that own significant blocks of our common stock. If 1 or more of these stockholders were to sell large portions of their holdings in a relatively short time, for liquidity or other reasons, the prevailing market price of shares of our common stock could be negatively affected. The price of our stock may fluctuate unpredictably in response to factors unrelated to our operating performance. The stock market periodically experiences significant price and volume fluctuations that are unrelated to the operating performance of particular companies. These broad market fluctuations may cause the market price of our common stock to drop. In particular, the market price of securities of smaller medical device companies, like ours, has been very unpredictable and may vary in response to announcements by us or our competitors concerning technological innovations; introductions of new products; FDA and foreign regulatory actions; developments or disputes relating to patents or proprietary rights; failure to meet the expectations of stock market analysts and investors; changes in stock market analyst recommendations regarding our common stock; changes in healthcare policy in the U.S. or other countries; and general stock market conditions and other factors unrelated to our operating performance. Some provisions of our charter documents, Delaware law, and our Convertible Senior Notes may make takeover attempts difficult, which could depress the price of our stock and inhibit 1 ability to receive a premium price for their shares. Provisions of our amended and restated certificate of incorporation could make it more difficult for a third party to acquire control of our business, even if such change in control would be beneficial to our stockholders. Our amended and restated certificate of incorporation allows our board of directors to issue up to five million shares of preferred stock and to fix the rights and preferences of such shares without stockholder approval. Any such issuance could make it more difficult for a third party to acquire our business and may adversely affect the rights of our stockholders. Our amended and restated bylaws include advance notice requirements for stockholder proposals that require stockholders to give written notice of any proposal or director nomination to us within a specified period of time prior to any stockholder meeting and do not permit stockholders to call a special meeting of the stockholders, unless such stockholders hold not less than 50% of our stock entitled to vote at the meeting. We are also subject to anti takeover provisions under Delaware law. Together these provisions may delay, deter or prevent a change in control of us, adversely affecting the market price of our common stock. In addition, the terms of our Convertible Senior Notes require us to offer to purchase the notes for cash in the event of a fundamental change. A non stock takeover of our company may trigger the requirement that we purchase the Convertible Senior Notes. This feature may have the effect of delaying or preventing a takeover of our company that would otherwise be beneficial to investors. 23 We do not anticipate declaring any cash dividends on our common stock. We have never declared or paid cash dividends on our common stock and do not plan to pay any cash dividends in the near future. Our current policy is to retain all funds and any earnings for use in the operation and expansion of our business. Our Senior Credit Facility contains restrictions prohibiting us from paying any cash dividends without the lenders prior approval. Item 1B. Unresolved Staff Comments N1 Item 2 Properties
